Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB878.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1857(a), (d) introductory paragraph and (e) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1857. Cosmetology Training through Career and Technical Center [Pilot] Program.--(a) The Cosmetology Training Through Career And Technical Center [Pilot] Program is established in the State Board of Cosmetology.* * *(d) No later than June [30, 2023, and] 1 each year [thereafter through June 30, 2025], each CTC and secondary school participating in the [pilot] program shall report the following information to the State Board of Cosmetology on a 123456789101112131415161718192021 form prescribed by the board:* * *[(e) The pilot program under this section shall expire three years from the effective date of this section.]* * *Section 2. The Cosmetology Training Through Career and Technical Center Program is a continuation of the Cosmetology Training Through Career and Technical Center Pilot Program. The conversion to a regular program is a continuation of the pilot program and all activities initiated under the pilot program shall continue and remain in full force and effect. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made under the pilot program and which are in effect on the effective date of this section shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under the pilot program are not affected nor impaired by the conversion from the pilot program.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0878PN0978 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819